North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 1B. Commissions and Councils.

Part 1. Commission of Anatomy.

§ 130A-33.30.
Commission of Anatomy — Creation; powers and duties.

There is created the Commission of Anatomy in the Department with the power and duty to adopt rules for the distribution of dead human bodies and parts thereof for the purpose of promoting the study of anatomy in the State of North Carolina. The Commission
is authorized to receive dead bodies pursuant to

G.S. 130A-412.13

and to be a donee of a body or parts thereof pursuant to Part 3A, Article 16 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes known as the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act and to distribute such bodies or parts thereof pursuant
to the rules adopted by the Commission.

History.
1975, c. 694, s. 2; 1989, c. 727, ss. 182(a), 183; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 29; 1997-443, s. 11A.69; 2007-538, s. 9.

§ 130A-33.31.
Commission of Anatomy — Members; selection; term; chairman; quorum; meetings.

The Commission of Anatomy shall consist of six members, one representative from the field of mortuary science, and one each from The University of North Carolina School of Medicine, East Carolina University School of Medicine, Duke University School of
Medicine, Bowman Gray School of Medicine, and Campbell University School of Osteopathic Medicine. The dean of each school shall make recommendations and the Secretary shall appoint from such recommendations a member to the Commission.
The president of the State Board of Funeral Service shall appoint the representative from the field of mortuary science to the Commission. The members shall serve terms of four years except two of the original members shall serve
a term of one year, one shall serve a term of two years, one shall serve a term of three years, and one shall serve a term of four years. The Secretary shall determine the terms of the original members.

Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, death, or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

The Secretary shall remove any member of the Commission from office for misfeasance, malfeasance or nonfeasance.

The Commission shall elect a chair annually from its own membership.

A majority of the Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The Commission shall meet at any time and place within the State at the call of the chair or upon the written request of three members.

All clerical and other services required by the Commission shall be supplied by the Secretary.

History.
1975, c. 694, s. 2; 1989, c. 727, ss. 182(a), 184; 1995, c. 123, s. 5; 1997-443, s. 11A.70; 2003-420, s. 1; 2015-264, s. 70.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 70, effective October 1, 2015, in the first sentence of subsection (a), substituted “six members” for “five members” and substituted “Bowman Gray School of Medicine, and Campbell University School of Osteopathic Medicine” for
“and Bowman Gray School of Medicine.”

§ 130A-33.32.
Commission of Anatomy — Reference to former Board of Anatomy in testamentary disposition.

A testamentary disposition of a body or part thereof to the former Board of Anatomy shall be deemed in all respects to be a disposition to the Commission of Anatomy.

History.
1975, c. 694, s. 2; 1989, c. 727, ss. 182(a), 185.

§§ 130A-33.33 through 130A-33.39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Governor’s Council on Physical Fitness and Health.

§§ 130A-33.40,
130A-33.41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.30(a), effective July 1, 2011.

History.
S. 130A-33.40; 1979, c. 634; 1989, c. 727, ss. 186, 187; 1991, c. 96, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.71; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.30(a), effective July 1, 2011. s. 130A-33.41; 1979, c. 634; 1989, c. 727, ss. 186, 188; 1991, c.
739, s. 20; 1997-443, s. 11A.72; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.30(a), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 130A-33.42.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Minority Health Advisory Council.

§ 130A-33.43.
Minority Health Advisory Council.

There is established the Minority Health Advisory Council in the Department. The Council shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To make recommendations to the Governor and the Secretary aimed at improving the health status of North Carolina’s minority populations;

To identify and examine the limitations and problems associated with existing laws, regulations, programs and services related to the health status of North Carolina’s minority populations;

To examine the financing and access to health services for North Carolina’s minority populations;

To identify and review health promotion and disease prevention strategies relating to the leading causes of death and disability among minority populations; and

To advise the Governor and the Secretary upon any matter which the Governor or Secretary may refer to it.

History.
1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 166; 1997-443, s. 11A.73.

§ 130A-33.44.
Minority Health Advisory Council — members; selection; quorum; compensation.

The Minority Health Advisory Council in the Department shall consist of 15 members to be appointed as follows:

Five members shall be appointed by the Governor. Members appointed by the Governor shall be representatives of the following: health care providers, public health, health related public and private agencies and organizations, community-based organizations,
and human services agencies and organizations.

Five members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, two of whom shall be members of the House of Representatives, and at least one of whom shall be a public member. The remainder of the Speaker’s appointees shall be representative
of any of the entities named in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Five members shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, two of whom shall be members of the Senate, and at least one of whom shall be a public member. The remainder of the President Pro Tempore’s appointees shall be representative
of any of the entities named in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Of the members appointed by the Governor, two shall serve initial terms of one year, two shall serve initial terms of two years, and one shall serve an initial term of three years. Thereafter, the Governor’s appointees shall serve terms of four years.

Of the nonlegislative members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, two shall serve initial terms of two years, and one shall serve an initial term of three years. Thereafter, nonlegislative members appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives shall serve terms of four years. Of the nonlegislative members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, two shall serve initial terms of two years, and one shall serve an initial term
of three years. Thereafter, nonlegislative members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve terms of four years. Legislative members of the Council shall serve two-year terms.

The Chairperson of the Council shall be elected by the Council from among its membership.

The majority of the Council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Members of the Council shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

or

G.S. 138-6

, or travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 120-3.1

, as applicable.

All clerical support and other services required by the Council shall be provided by the Department.

History.
1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 166; 1997-443, s. 11A.74.

§§ 130A-33.45 through 130A-33.49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Advisory Committee on Cancer Coordination and Control.

§ 130A-33.50.
Advisory Committee on Cancer Coordination and Control established; membership, compensation.

The Advisory Committee on Cancer Coordination and Control is established in the Department.

The Committee shall have up to 34 members, including the Secretary of the Department or the Secretary’s designee. The members of the Committee shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among the Committee membership. The Committee shall meet not more than
twice a year at the call of the chair. Six of the members shall be legislators, three of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and three of whom shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate. Four of the members shall be cancer survivors, two of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and two of whom shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. The remainder
of the members shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:

One member from the Department of Environmental Quality;

Three members, one from each of the following: the Department, the Department of Public Instruction, and the North Carolina Community College System;

Four members representing the cancer control programs at North Carolina medical schools, one from each of the following: the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill School of Medicine, the Bowman Gray School of Medicine, the Duke University School
of Medicine, and the East Carolina University School of Medicine;

One member who is an oncology nurse representing the North Carolina Nurses Association;

One member representing the Cancer Committee of the North Carolina Medical Society;

One member representing the Old North State Medical Society;

One member representing the American Cancer Society, North Carolina Division, Inc.;

One member representing the North Carolina Hospital Association;

One member representing the North Carolina Association of Local Health Directors;

One member who is a primary care physician licensed to practice medicine in North Carolina;

One member representing the American College of Surgeons;

One member representing the North Carolina Oncology Society;

One member representing the Association of North Carolina Cancer Registrars;

One member representing the Medical Directors of the North Carolina Association of Health Plans; and

Up to four additional members at large.Except for the Secretary, the members shall be appointed for staggered four-year terms and until their successors are appointed and qualify. The Governor may remove any member of the Committee from office in accordance
with the provisions of

G.S. 143B-13

. Members may succeed themselves for one term and may be appointed again after being off the Committee for one term.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Governor shall make their appointments to the Committee not later than 30 days after the adjournment of the 1993 Regular Session of the General Assembly. A vacancy
on the Committee shall be filled by the original appointing authority, using the criteria set out in this section for the original appointment.

To the extent that funds are made available, members of the Committee shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-5

.

A majority of the Committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of its business.

The Committee may use funds allocated to it to employ an administrative staff person to assist the Committee in carrying out its duties. The Secretary shall provide clerical and other support staff services needed by the Committee.

History.
1993, c. 321, s. 288; 1997-443, s. 11A.75; 1998-212, s. 12.48(a); 2013-360, s. 12A.10; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12A.10, effective July 1, 2013, inserted “not more than twice a year” in the third sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (b)(1).

§ 130A-33.51.
Advisory Committee on Cancer Coordination and Control; responsibilities.

The Advisory Committee on Cancer Coordination and Control has the following responsibilities:

To recommend to the Secretary a plan for the statewide implementation of an interagency comprehensive coordinated cancer control program;

To identify and examine the limitations and problems associated with existing laws, regulations, programs, and services related to cancer control;

To examine the financing and access to cancer control services for North Carolina’s citizens, and advise the Secretary on a coordinated and efficient use of resources;

To identify and review health promotion and disease prevention strategies relating to the leading causes of cancer mortality and morbidity;

To recommend standards for:

Oversight and development of cancer control services;

Development and maintenance of interagency training and technical assistance in the provision of cancer control services;

Program monitoring and data collection;

Statewide evaluation of locally based cancer control programs;

Coordination of funding sources for cancer control programs; and

Procedures for awarding grants to local agencies providing cancer control services.

The Committee shall submit a written report not later than May 1, 1994, and not later than October 1 of each subsequent year, to the Secretary. The report shall address the progress in implementation of a cancer control program. The report shall include
an accounting of funds expended and anticipated funding needs for full implementation of recommended programs.

History.
1993, c. 321, s. 288; 2013-360, s. 12A.9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12A.9, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “the Secretary” for “the Governor and to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

§§ 130A-33.52 through 130A-33.59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Maternal Mortality Review Committee.

§ 130A-33.60.
Maternal Mortality Review Committee; membership, compensation.

The Maternal Mortality Review Committee is established in the Department. The purpose of the committee is to reduce maternal mortality in this State by conducting multidisciplinary maternal death reviews and developing recommendations for the prevention
of future maternal deaths.

The Secretary shall appoint a multidisciplinary committee comprised of nine members who represent several academic disciplines and professional specializations essential to reviewing cases of mortality due to complications from pregnancy or childbirth.
Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may receive travel reimbursement from funds available to the Department.

The duties of the committee shall include:

Identifying maternal death cases.

Reviewing medical records and other relevant data.

Contacting family members and other affected or involved persons to collect additional relevant data.

Consulting with relevant experts to evaluate relevant data.

Making nonindividual determinations with no legal meaning regarding the preventability of maternal deaths.

Making recommendations for the prevention of maternal deaths.

Disseminating findings and recommendations to policy makers, health care providers, health care facilities, and the general public. Reports shall include only aggregated, nonindividually identifiable data.

Licensed health care providers, health care facilities, and pharmacies shall provide reasonable access to the committee to all relevant medical records associated with a case under review by the committee. A health care provider, health care facility,
or pharmacy providing access to medical records pursuant to this Part shall not be held liable for civil damages or be subject to any criminal or disciplinary action for good faith efforts to provide such records.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, information, records, reports, statements, notes, memoranda, or other data collected pursuant to this Part shall not be admissible as evidence in any action of any kind in any court or before any other
tribunal, board, agency, or person, nor shall they be exhibited nor their contents disclosed in any way, in whole or in part, by any officer or representative of the Department or any other person, except as may be necessary for
the purpose of furthering the committee’s review of the case to which they relate. No person participating in such review shall disclose, in any manner, the information so obtained except in strict conformity with the review process.

All information, records of interviews, written reports, statements, memoranda, or other data obtained by the Department, the committee, and other persons, agencies, or organizations so authorized by the Department pursuant to this Part shall be confidential.

All proceedings and activities of the committee pursuant to this Part, opinions of committee members formed as a result of such proceedings and activities, and records obtained, created, or maintained pursuant to this Part, including records of interviews,
written reports, and statements procured by the Department or any other person, agency, or organization acting jointly or under contract with the Department in connection with the requirements of this Part, shall be confidential
and shall not be subject to statutes relating to open meetings and open records, or subject to subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding.

Nothing in this Part shall be construed to limit or restrict the right to discover or use in any civil or criminal proceeding anything that is available from another source.

Members of the committee shall not be questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding regarding the information presented or opinions formed as a result of a meeting or communication of the committee; provided, however, that nothing in this Part shall
be construed to prevent a member of the committee from testifying to information obtained independently of the committee or which is public information.

History.
2015-62, s. 6(a).

§§ 130A-33.61 through 130A-33.64.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Taylor’s Law Establishing the Advisory Council on Rare Diseases.

§ 1B.
Advisory Council on Rare Diseases; membership; terms; compensation; meetings; quorum.

There is established the Advisory Council on Rare Diseases within the School of Medicine of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill to advise the Governor, the Secretary, and the General Assembly on research, diagnosis, treatment, and education
relating to rare diseases. This Part shall be known as Taylor’s Law Establishing the Advisory Council on Rare Diseases. For purposes of this Part, “rare disease” has the same meaning as provided in 21 U.S.C. § 360bb.

Advisory Council Membership.

Upon the recommendation of the Dean of the School of Medicine of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, the Secretary shall appoint members to the advisory council as follows:

A physician licensed and practicing in this State with experience researching, diagnosing, or treating rare diseases.

A medical researcher with experience conducting research concerning rare diseases.

A registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed and practicing in the State with experience treating rare diseases.

One rare diseases survivor.

One member who represents a rare diseases foundation.

One representative from each academic research institution in this State that receives any grant funding for rare diseases research.

The chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, or the chairs’ designees, shall serve on the advisory council. A member of the advisory council who is designated by the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services may be a member of the General Assembly.

The Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee, shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the advisory council.

Members appointed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall serve for a term of three years, and no member shall serve more than two consecutive terms.

Members of the advisory council shall receive per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

or

G.S. 138-6

or travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 120-3.1

, as applicable.

All administrative support and other services required by the advisory council shall be provided by the School of Medicine of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.

Upon the recommendation of the Dean of the School of Medicine of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, the Secretary shall select the chair of the advisory council from among the members of the council.

The chair shall convene the first meeting of the advisory council no later than October 1, 2015. A majority of the council members shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of a quorum shall be required for any official action of the advisory council.
Following the first meeting, the advisory council shall meet upon the call of the chair or upon the request of a majority of council members.

History.
2015-199, s. 1; 2016-30, s. 3.

§ 130A-33.66.
Advisory Council on Rare Diseases; powers and duties; reports.

The advisory council shall have the following powers and duties:

Advise on coordinating statewide efforts for the study of the incidence of rare diseases within the State and the status of the rare disease community.

Report to the Secretary, the Governor, and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on behalf of the General Assembly not later than January 1, 2016, and annually thereafter, on the activities of the advisory council and
its findings and recommendations regarding rare disease research and care in North Carolina, including any recommendations for statutory changes and amendments to the structure, organization, and powers or duties of the advisory
council.

History.
2015-199, s. 1.